fr/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/fr.aff
FLAG long
SFX iG Y 43
SFX iG êtir êtir/n'q'd'l'm't's' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtant/n'q'd'l'm't's' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtu/L'D'Q' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtus/D'Q' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtue/L'D'Q' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtues/D'Q' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êts/j'n'q'l'm't' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êt/n'q'l'm't's' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtons/n'q'l't' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtez/n'q'l'm' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtent/n'q'l'm't's' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtais/j'n'q'l'm't' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtait/n'q'l'm't's' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtions/n'q'l't' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtiez/n'q'l'm' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtaient/n'q'l'm't's' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtis/j'n'q'l'm't' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtit/n'q'l'm't's' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtîmes/n'q'l't' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtîtes/n'q'l'm' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtirent/n'q'l'm't's' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtirai/j'n'q'l'm't' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtiras/n'q'l'm't' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtira/n'q'l'm't's' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtirons/n'q'l't' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtirez/n'q'l'm' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtiront/n'q'l'm't's' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtirais/j'n'q'l'm't' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtirait/n'q'l'm't's' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtirions/n'q'l't' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtiriez/n'q'l'm' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtiraient/n'q'l'm't's' vêtir
SFX iG êtir ête/j'n'q'l'm't's' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtes/n'q'l'm't' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtisse/j'n'q'l'm't' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtisses/n'q'l'm't' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtît/n'q'l'm't's' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtissions/n'q'l't' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtissiez/n'q'l'm' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtissent/n'q'l'm't's' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êts/n'l'm't' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtons/n'l't' vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtez/n'l'm' vêtir

SFX iI Y 40
SFX iI ormir ormir/n'q'd'l'm't's' dormir
SFX iI ormir ormant/n'q'd'l'm't's' dormir
SFX iI ormir ormi/q' dormir
SFX iI ormir ors/j'n'q'l'm't' dormir
SFX iI ormir ort/n'q'l'm't's' dormir
SFX iI ormir ormons/n'q'l't' dormir
SFX iI ormir ormez/n'q'l'm' dormir
SFX iI ormir orment/n'q'l'm't's' dormir
SFX iI ormir ormais/j'n'q'l'm't' dormir
SFX iI ormir ormait/n'q'l'm't's' dormir
SFX iI ormir ormions/n'q'l't' dormir
SFX iI ormir ormiez/n'q'l'm' dormir
SFX iI ormir ormaient/n'q'l'm't's' dormir
SFX iI ormir ormis/j'n'q'l'm't' dormir
SFX iI ormir ormit/n'q'l'm't's' dormir
SFX iI ormir ormîmes/n'q'l't' dormir
SFX iI ormir ormîtes/n'q'l'm' dormir
SFX iI ormir ormirent/n'q'l'm't's' dormir
SFX iI ormir ormirai/j'n'q'l'm't' dormir
SFX iI ormir ormiras/n'q'l'm't' dormir
SFX iI ormir ormira/n'q'l'm't's' dormir
SFX iI ormir ormirons/n'q'l't' dormir
SFX iI ormir ormirez/n'q'l'm' dormir
SFX iI ormir ormiront/n'q'l'm't's' dormir
SFX iI ormir ormirais/j'n'q'l'm't' dormir
SFX iI ormir ormirait/n'q'l'm't's' dormir
SFX iI ormir ormirions/n'q'l't' dormir
SFX iI ormir ormiriez/n'q'l'm' dormir
SFX iI ormir ormiraient/n'q'l'm't's' dormir
SFX iI ormir orme/j'n'q'l'm't's' dormir
SFX iI ormir ormes/n'q'l'm't' dormir
SFX iI ormir ormisse/j'n'q'l'm't' dormir
SFX iI ormir ormisses/n'q'l'm't' dormir
SFX iI ormir ormît/n'q'l'm't's' dormir
SFX iI ormir ormissions/n'q'l't' dormir
SFX iI ormir ormissiez/n'q'l'm' dormir
SFX iI ormir ormissent/n'q'l'm't's' dormir
SFX iI ormir ors/n'l'm't' dormir
SFX iI ormir ormons/n'l't' dormir
SFX iI ormir ormez/n'l'm' dormir

SFX iJ Y 43
SFX iJ dormir dormir/n'q'd'l'm't's' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormant/n'q'd'l'm't's' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormi/L'D'Q' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormis/D'Q' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormie/L'D'Q' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormies/D'Q' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dors/j'n'q'l'm't' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dort/n'q'l'm't's' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormons/n'q'l't' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormez/n'q'l'm' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dorment/n'q'l'm't's' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormais/j'n'q'l'm't' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormait/n'q'l'm't's' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormions/n'q'l't' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormiez/n'q'l'm' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormaient/n'q'l'm't's' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormis/j'n'q'l'm't' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormit/n'q'l'm't's' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormîmes/n'q'l't' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormîtes/n'q'l'm' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormirent/n'q'l'm't's' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormirai/j'n'q'l'm't' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormiras/n'q'l'm't' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormira/n'q'l'm't's' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormirons/n'q'l't' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormirez/n'q'l'm' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormiront/n'q'l'm't's' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormirais/j'n'q'l'm't' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormirait/n'q'l'm't's' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormirions/n'q'l't' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormiriez/n'q'l'm' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormiraient/n'q'l'm't's' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dorme/j'n'q'l'm't's' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormes/n'q'l'm't' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormisse/j'n'q'l'm't' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormisses/n'q'l'm't' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormît/n'q'l'm't's' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormissions/n'q'l't' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormissiez/n'q'l'm' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormissent/n'q'l'm't's' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dors/n'l'm't' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormons/n'l't' dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormez/n'l'm' dormir

SFX iK Y 42
SFX iK quérir quérir/n'q'd'l'm't's' quérir
SFX iK quérir quérant/n'q'd'l'm't's' quérir
SFX iK quérir quis/L'D'Q' quérir
SFX iK quérir quise/L'D'Q' quérir
SFX iK quérir quises/D'Q' quérir
SFX iK quérir quiers/j'n'q'l'm't' quérir
SFX iK quérir quiert/n'q'l'm't's' quérir
SFX iK quérir quérons/n'q'l't' quérir
SFX iK quérir quérez/n'q'l'm' quérir
SFX iK quérir quièrent/n'q'l'm't's' quérir
SFX iK quérir quérais/j'n'q'l'm't' quérir
SFX iK quérir quérait/n'q'l'm't's' quérir
SFX iK quérir quérions/n'q'l't' quérir
SFX iK quérir quériez/n'q'l'm' quérir
SFX iK quérir quéraient/n'q'l'm't's' quérir
SFX iK quérir quis/j'n'q'l'm't' quérir
SFX iK quérir quit/n'q'l'm't's' quérir
SFX iK quérir quîmes/n'q'l't' quérir
SFX iK quérir quîtes/n'q'l'm' quérir
SFX iK quérir quirent/n'q'l'm't's' quérir
SFX iK quérir querrai/j'n'q'l'm't' quérir
SFX iK quérir querras/n'q'l'm't' quérir
SFX iK quérir querra/n'q'l'm't's' quérir
SFX iK quérir querrons/n'q'l't' quérir
SFX iK quérir querrez/n'q'l'm' quérir
SFX iK quérir querront/n'q'l'm't's' quérir
SFX iK quérir querrais/j'n'q'l'm't' quérir
SFX iK quérir querrait/n'q'l'm't's' quérir
SFX iK quérir querrions/n'q'l't' quérir
SFX iK quérir querriez/n'q'l'm' quérir
SFX iK quérir querraient/n'q'l'm't's' quérir
SFX iK quérir quière/j'n'q'l'm't's' quérir
SFX iK quérir quières/n'q'l'm't' quérir
SFX iK quérir quisse/j'n'q'l'm't' quérir
SFX iK quérir quisses/n'q'l'm't' quérir
SFX iK quérir quît/n'q'l'm't's' quérir
SFX iK quérir quissions/n'q'l't' quérir
SFX iK quérir quissiez/n'q'l'm' quérir
SFX iK quérir quissent/n'q'l'm't's' quérir
SFX iK quérir quiers/n'l'm't' quérir
SFX iK quérir quérons/n'l't' quérir
SFX iK quérir quérez/n'l'm' quérir

SFX iN Y 41
SFX iN uir uir/n'q'd'l'm't's' fuir
SFX iN uir uyant/n'q'd'l'm't's' fuir
SFX iN uir ui/d'q' fuir
SFX iN uir uis/d'q' fuir
SFX iN uir uie/d'q' fuir
SFX iN uir uies/d'q' fuir
SFX iN uir uis/j'n'q'l'm't' fuir
SFX iN uir uit/n'q'l'm't's' fuir
SFX iN uir uyons/n'q'l't' fuir
SFX iN uir uyez/n'q'l'm' fuir
SFX iN uir uient/n'q'l'm't's' fuir
SFX iN uir uyais/j'n'q'l'm't' fuir
SFX iN uir uyait/n'q'l'm't's' fuir
SFX iN uir uyions/n'q'l't' fuir
SFX iN uir uyiez/n'q'l'm' fuir
SFX iN uir uyaient/n'q'l'm't's' fuir
SFX iN uir uîmes/n'q'l't' fuir
SFX iN uir uîtes/n'q'l'm' fuir
SFX iN uir uirent/n'q'l'm't's' fuir
SFX iN uir uirai/j'n'q'l'm't' fuir
SFX iN uir uiras/n'q'l'm't' fuir
SFX iN uir uira/n'q'l'm't's' fuir
SFX iN uir uirons/n'q'l't' fuir
SFX iN uir uirez/n'q'l'm' fuir
SFX iN uir uiront/n'q'l'm't's' fuir
SFX iN uir uirais/j'n'q'l'm't' fuir
SFX iN uir uirait/n'q'l'm't's' fuir
SFX iN uir uirions/n'q'l't' fuir
SFX iN uir uiriez/n'q'l'm' fuir
SFX iN uir uiraient/n'q'l'm't's' fuir
SFX iN uir uie/j'n'q'l'm't's' fuir
SFX iN uir uies/n'q'l'm't' fuir
SFX iN uir uisse/j'n'q'l'm't' fuir
SFX iN uir uisses/n'q'l'm't' fuir
SFX iN uir uît/n'q'l'm't's' fuir
SFX iN uir uissions/n'q'l't' fuir
SFX iN uir uissiez/n'q'l'm' fuir
SFX iN uir uissent/n'q'l'm't's' fuir
SFX iN uir uis/n'l'm't' fuir
SFX iN uir uyons/n'l't' fuir
SFX iN uir uyez/n'l'm' fuir
