fr/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/fr.dic
acquérir/iK
conquérir/iK
dévêtir/iG
dormir/iI
endormir/iJ
enquérir/iK
fuir/iN
réacquérir/iK
reconquérir/iK
redormir/iI
rendormir/iJ
requérir/iK
revêtir/iG
survêtir/iG
vêtir/iG
